New Jersey, session 221, A2966.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 6 of P.L.1996, c.60 (C.54A:3A-20) is amended to read as follows: 6.  a.  (1) Notwithstanding any provision of [this act] P.L.1996, c.60 (C.54A:3A-15 et seq.) to the contrary [, commencing with the taxpayer's taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1996]: (a)  a taxpayer; or (b)  a resident of this State who is 65 years of age or older at the close of the taxable year or who is allowed to claim a personal deduction as a blind or disabled taxpayer pursuant to subsection b. of N.J.S.54A:3-1 but who, pursuant to N.J.S.54A:2-4,  is not subject to tax; and, who paid property taxes or rent constituting property taxes on a homestead during the calendar year may elect to take a credit instead of the deduction provided pursuant to section 3, 4, or 5 of P.L.1996, c.60 (C.54A:3A-17 to C.54A:3A-19)  in the amount of [$50, subject to the provisions of paragraph (2) of this subsection] $200. (2)  [Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection, the amount of tax liability reduction or credit allowed for the taxpayer's taxable year beginning during 1996 shall be $25 and the amount of tax liability reduction or credit allowed for the taxpayer's taxable year beginning during 1997 shall be $37.50.] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.   ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) b.  [A husband and wife] Married individuals who elect to file separate income tax returns pursuant to the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., shall each be entitled to one-half of the credit allowed pursuant to subsection a. of this section. c.  The credit shall be paid to the taxpayer as a refund of overpayment pursuant to N.J.S.54A:9-7, provided however, that subsection (f) of that section shall not apply.  The credit for a claimant qualified under subsection a. of this section who, pursuant to N.J.S.54A:2-4,  is not subject to tax,  shall be applied for annually on an application as shall be made available by the director, to be filed with the director on or before the date for filing annual gross income tax returns.  The director shall determine the form and manner by which a qualified applicant shall apply for a refund of an overpayment pursuant to this section, and the time of the refund of the overpayment.  For the purposes of this section, refunds of overpayments may be combined with payments of rebates pursuant to P.L.1990, c.61 (C.54:4-8.57 et seq.). (cf: P.L.1996, c.60, s.6) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and apply to taxable years ending after the date of enactment.